trunk/resultats/catalan_i.aff
flag *Y:    # Preposició "de" apostrofada
    .                    > D'                   # d'algú
    .                    > D'                   # D'Algaida
    A                    > D'A                  # d'Aire
    A                    > D'A                  # D'Aire
    À                    > D'À                  # d'Àguila
    À                    > D'À                  # D'Àguila
    E                    > D'E                  # d'Esperit
    E                    > D'E                  # D'Esperit
    È                    > D'È                  # d'Època
    È                    > D'È                  # D'Època
    É                    > D'É                  # 
    É                    > D'É                  # 
    I                    > D'I                  # d'Illa
    I                    > D'I                  # D'Illa
    Í                    > D'Í                  # 
    Í                    > D'Í                  # 
    O                    > D'O                  # d'Ordre
    O                    > D'O                  # D'Ordre
    Ò                    > D'Ò                  # d'Òliba
    Ò                    > D'Ò                  # D'Òliba
    Ó                    > D'Ó                  # 
    Ó                    > D'Ó                  # 
    U                    > D'U                  # d'Urna
    U                    > D'U                  # D'Urna
    Ú                    > D'Ú                  # d'Únic
    Ú                    > D'Ú                  # D'Únic
    H                    > D'H                  # d'Hora
    H                    > D'H                  # D'Hora

flag *Z:    # Pronoms personals prefixats
    .                    > M'                   # m'abillo
    .                    > T'                   # t'abillo
    .                    > S'                   # s'abilla
    .                    > L'                   # l'abillo
    .                    > N'                   # n'abillo


suffixes

flag *C:    # Pronoms personals enclítics darrere consonant
    .                    > \-ME                 # posar-me
    .                    > \-NOS                # posar-nos
    .                    > \-TE                 # posar-te
    .                    > \-VOS                # posar-vos
    .                    > \-SE                 # posar-se
    .                    > \-LO                 # posar-lo
    .                    > \-LA                 # posar-la
    .                    > \-LI                 # posar-li
    .                    > \-LOS                # posar-los
    .                    > \-LES                # posar-les
    .                    > \-HO                 # posar-ho
    .                    > \-HI                 # posar-hi
    .                    > \-NE                 # posar-ne
    .                    > \-SE'T               # posar-se't
    .                    > \-SE\-US             # posar-se-us
    .                    > \-SE'M               # posar-se'm
    .                    > \-TE'M               # posar-te'm
    .                    > \-VOS\-EM            # posar-vos-em
    .                    > \-SE'NS              # posar-se'ns
    .                    > \-TE'NS              # posar-te'ns
    .                    > \-VOS\-ENS           # posar-vos-ens
    .                    > \-SE'L               # posar-se'l
    .                    > \-TE'L               # posar-te'l
    .                    > \-VOS\-EL            # posar-vos-el
    .                    > \-ME'L               # posar-me'l
    .                    > \-NOS\-EL            # posar-nos-el
    .                    > \-LOS\-EL            # posar-los-el
    .                    > \-L'HI               # posar-l'hi
    .                    > \-SE'LS              # posar-se'ls
    .                    > \-TE'LS              # posar-te'ls
    .                    > \-VOS\-ELS           # posar-vos-els
    .                    > \-ME'LS              # posar-me'ls
    .                    > \-NOS\-ELS           # posar-nos-els
    .                    > \-LOS\-ELS           # posar-los-els
    .                    > \-LOS\-HI            # posar-los-hi
    .                    > \-SE\-LA             # posar-se-la
    .                    > \-TE\-LA             # posar-te-la
    .                    > \-VOS\-LA            # posar-vos-la
    .                    > \-ME\-LA             # posar-me-la
    .                    > \-NOS\-LA            # posar-nos-la
    .                    > \-LOS\-LA            # posar-los-la
    .                    > \-LA\-HI             # posar-la-hi
    .                    > \-SE\-LES            # posar-se-les
    .                    > \-TE\-LES            # posar-te-les
    .                    > \-VOS\-LES           # posar-vos-les
    .                    > \-ME\-LES            # posar-me-les
    .                    > \-NOS\-LES           # posar-nos-les
    .                    > \-LOS\-LES           # posar-los-les
    .                    > \-LES\-HI            # posar-les-hi
    .                    > \-SE\-LI             # posar-se-li
    .                    > \-TE\-LI             # posar-te-li
    .                    > \-VOS\-LI            # posar-vos-li
    .                    > \-ME\-LI             # posar-me-li
    .                    > \-NOS\-LI            # posar-nos-li
    .                    > \-S'HO               # posar-s'ho
    .                    > \-T'HO               # posar-t'ho
    .                    > \-VOS\-HO            # posar-vos-ho
    .                    > \-M'HO               # posar-m'ho
    .                    > \-NOS\-HO            # posar-nos-ho
    .                    > \-LOS\-HO            # posar-los-ho
    .                    > \-LI\-HO             # posar-li-ho
    .                    > \-SE'N               # posar-se'n
    .                    > \-TE'N               # posar-te'n
    .                    > \-VOS\-EN            # posar-vos-en
    .                    > \-ME'N               # posar-me'n
    .                    > \-NOS\-EN            # posar-nos-en
    .                    > \-L'EN               # posar-l'en
    .                    > \-LOS\-EN            # posar-los-en
    .                    > \-LA'N               # posar-la'n
    .                    > \-LES\-EN            # posar-les-en
    .                    > \-LI'N               # posar-li'n
    .                    > \-S'HI               # posar-s'hi
    .                    > \-T'HI               # posar-t'hi
    .                    > \-VOS\-HI            # posar-vos-hi
    .                    > \-M'HI               # posar-m'hi
    .                    > \-NOS\-HI            # posar-nos-hi
    .                    > \-L'HI               # posar-l'hi
    .                    > \-LOS\-HI            # posar-los-hi
    .                    > \-LA\-HI             # posar-la-hi
    .                    > \-LES\-HI            # posar-les-hi
    .                    > \-N'HI               # posar-n'hi
