trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
Aigulf/WY
Aldea/VY
Alsàcia/Y
Angostrina/Y
Argimir/WY
Assuéver/Y
Elionor/WY
Espinassa/WY
Evenci/WY
Ilduara/Y
Omells/Y
Ursicina/Y
abatedora/EVY
abismava/AZ
ablenar/CY
aboleix/C
abreviadora/EVY
abriolava/AZ
abstergiu/C
abstersiu/BVY
abstindries/Z
abstrauen/Z
acanada/EVY
acanava/AZ
acatxin/C
acceleratriu/EVY
acerava/AZ
acicular/EVY
acne/EVY
acomboiar/CY
acompliré/MNZ
acorreguéssim/Z
acotiava/AZ
acromàtica/EVY
acubillen/C
addicionava/AZ
adenosina/EVY
adiguéreu/Z
administrava/AZ
adoctrinen/C
adprecació/GVY
adulava/AZ
advinguen/CZ
afalconat/BVY
afalconava/AZ
afanant/C
afillava/AZ
afligim/C
afogada/EVY
agafava/AZ
agenollin/C
aglevament/EVY
agotzonava/AZ
aguaitat/BVY
aguerrisquen/C
ahín/Z
ajeim/Z
ajornalament/EVY
alar/CEVY
alcalimètrica/EVY
alegrava/AZ
aliar/CY
alleven/C
allitava/AZ
alot/EVY
al·lotam/EVY
al·lucín/Z
amagrim/C
amatín/Z
amaçar/CY
amin/C
amistosament/Y
amorriava/AZ
amuntegant/C
amén/Y
anassis/Z
andoiar/CY
animalització/GVY
aniré/TZ
anostrin/C
antibaló/GVY
antiplàstic/FVY
anyina/EVY
anàssiu/Z
apareixia/OZ
aparroquianau/C
apenjollat/BVY
apetiré/MNZ
aplaudint/C
apoplèctic/FVY
apoquiré/MNZ
aprovava/AZ
apurar/CY
ardat/EVY
arengava/AZ
arilant/C
armilla/EVY
arrapava/AZ
arreglament/EVY
arreplegava/AZ
arrossinin/C
arruïnava/AZ
arsònic/EVY
asfixiat/BVY
assaonava/AZ
asserrerat/BVY
associava/AZ
assosseguin/C
astènia/EVY
ataüllava/AZ
atiant/C
atindreu/Z
atinguí/Z
atonyinat/BVY
atreim/Z
auditau/C
aufrany/EVY
autofinançava/AZ
autopàtica/EVY
aveïnava/AZ
avifauna/EVY
avingueu/Z
balbucegin/C
beleu/C
bombollegem/C
bronzegin/C
calabruixin/C
capiculem/C
cataloguem/C
clapix/C
col·lacionin/C
compungix/C
conjugar/C
contraforjant/C
cornau/C
cuclegeu/C
defallint/C
deportin/C
desamistanceu/C
desavinguen/C
desclucant/C
desdoneu/C
desemmerletem/C
desencantau/C
desenfarfegar/C
desenredem/C
desespessim/C
deshipotecant/C
desmitifiquen/C
despersonalitzen/C
destorçau/C
diferir/C
distanciïn/C
ectocarpal/EVY
editava/AZ
efluir/CY
eixamorat/BVY
eixien/Z
eixíem/Z
electropositiva/EVY
embacín/Z
emballestar/CY
embandereu/C
embarrancava/AZ
emblanquín/Z
emborrascada/EVY
embotigava/AZ
embotisquen/C
embussava/AZ
emigració/GVY
emmantava/AZ
emmetzinen/C
emmorrallava/AZ
empallegada/EVY
empapussava/AZ
empegava/AZ
empentar/CY
empilament/EVY
empitarrava/AZ
emportinava/AZ
empudenteixin/C
emulat/BVY
emulsionava/AZ
encaixonava/AZ
encaparrotada/EVY
encaperonava/AZ
encaputxin/C
encastellava/AZ
encetar/CY
encetava/AZ
encofiem/C
encoixinava/AZ
encorregué/Z
encorríeu/Z
encreuerar/CY
endanyava/AZ
endollen/C
endotèrmic/FVY
enduem/Z
enduran/Z
enfarfegava/AZ
enflorava/AZ
enforatar/CY
enfranqueix/C
enfuges/Z
enfugís/Z
engaltava/AZ
engavanyadora/EVY
engirgolava/AZ
engordeixin/C
engrossiré/MNZ
enjogassadament/Y
enllagrimava/AZ
enlleïm/C
enlluernava/AZ
enquadrador/FVY
enranciré/MNZ
enrivetem/C
enrocava/AZ
ensafranar/CY
ensardín/Z
ensotava/AZ
entabanant/C
entebionar/CY
entendré/TZ
entossudiré/MNZ
entrecreuat/BVY
entredieu/Z
entrediràs/Z
entreguardant/C
entremesclava/AZ
entreobriríeu/Z
entretallava/AZ
entretingueren/Z
entreveiem/Z
entrevens/Z
entrevinguem/CZ
entrigava/AZ
entufat/BVY
enventava/AZ
enverdisquen/C
enxarxada/EVY
epítrope/EVY
ererava/AZ
erradívola/EVY
esbagoteu/C
esbojarrava/AZ
esboscassat/BVY
esbutzem/C
escalfeiré/MNZ
escamarlada/EVY
escarransidament/Y
escarufegem/C
escatainava/AZ
escodolat/BVY
escorreguera/Z
escridassar/CY
escrostonau/C
escruixiré/MZ
esdevinguis/Z
esfereït/BVY
esgrilleu/C
esgrogueiré/MNZ
esguellada/EVY
espair/CY
espallussava/AZ
esparveren/C
espectroscòpica/EVY
espesseiré/MNZ
espinel·la/EVY
espitllau/C
esportista/EVY
esprem/CSZ
esquinçada/EVY
estabulen/C
estan/Z
estaria/EVYZ
estiguis/Z
estilitzar/CY
estrafaríem/Z
estrangeritzin/C
estrangulada/EVY
estupefaent/EVY
està/Z
eudemonisme/EVY
excarcerin/C
excavador/FVY
excloïa/OZ
exigit/BVY
expropiable/EVY
exterioritzava/AZ
extirpen/C
exòtic/FVY
fenomenalitzar/C
flogisticau/C
franquegeu/C
galzen/C
girigueu/C
grunyim/C
hajava/AZ
hemaglutinació/GVY
herpetisme/EVY
hidrognòsia/EY
hipotensor/FVY
homòlisi/EVY
horripilava/AZ
hospitalitzau/C
iberoromà/HVY
imbricat/BVY
impersonalitzat/BVY
improvís/JVYZ
inacceptabilitat/EY
incoen/C
incongelable/EVY
incorries/Z
indiciblement/Y
inevitablement/Y
infància/EY
ingurgitava/AZ
insaculau/C
insatisfet/FVY
intel·lectualisme/EVY
interdiga/DZ
intervenim/Z
intimar/CY
inventin/C
investigava/AZ
iridós/JVY
isquiàtic/FVY
levigueu/C
llistin/C
malmeneu/C
marxen/C
metastatitzin/C
morigerin/C
neulant/C
obririen/Z
obstaculitzada/EVY
obtingueres/Z
obvingués/Z
occiu/C
odrina/EVY
ofenia/OZ
olíban/EVY
ondava/AZ
oposicionista/EVY
orgullosament/Y
os/VY
oxigenar/CY
oxirinca/EVY
pastau/C
peritant/C
pipant/C
polsinar/C
premunir/C
promocionin/C
quequegem/C
reaccionen/C
reclavau/C
reedifiqueu/C
reglamenteu/C
remolegen/C
representau/C
resulten/C
revigoritzar/C
rubriqueu/C
saquegeu/C
serien/CZ
simulem/C
sodomitzeu/C
sotsobrau/C
surregeu/C
temptegem/C
torcejau/C
transvestint/C
triïn/C
unicorn/EVY
uzbek/FVY
vagabundejar/C
victoregem/C
xarrupejant/C
òmicron/EVY
